North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-01 Tax Commissioner
57-01-15.1.
Tax incentives — State and local tax clearance.

A person may not claim a state or local tax incentive identified in section 54-35-26, unless the person has satisfied all state and local tax obligations and tax liens of record for taxes owed to the state or a political subdivision.

A person claiming a state tax incentive shall attach to the return or other filing schedule on which the tax incentive is claimed, a property tax clearance record from each county in which the person has a fifty percent or more ownership interest in the property.

A city or county may not grant a local tax incentive unless the person requesting the tax incentive is not delinquent on any property taxes and the person provides a state tax clearance record. A property tax clearance is required for property in which the person has a fifty percent or more ownership interest.

If a tax incentive applicant or claimant is a corporation or passthrough entity, any of the corporation’s or passthrough entity’s officers, governors, managing members, or partners charged with the responsibility for filing and paying property, income, income withholding, sales, or use tax are subject to the provisions of subsections 2 and 3.

If a person fails to comply with this section, the tax commissioner shall disallow that person’s state tax exemption or credit claimed under any law authorizing the tax commissioner to audit and assess the additional tax due.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 413, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after July 31, 2017.

57-01-16.
Extension of period of time to make assessments.

If the tax commissioner issues a subpoena to a taxpayer, the period of time for making an assessment against that taxpayer is automatically extended by a period equal to the time between the issuance of the subpoena to final resolution. Final resolution occurs when a court dismisses the subpoena or the taxpayer complies with the subpoena.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 648, § 1.

57-01-17.
Failure to complete return or supply information.

If the tax commissioner is of the opinion that any taxpayer has failed to include in a return as filed, or to provide during the course of an audit, information necessary to determine a North Dakota tax liability, the tax commissioner may require from the taxpayer an amended return or supplementary information as is necessary to properly and accurately determine a taxpayer’s North Dakota tax liability, in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner. If the taxpayer fails to file the amended return or to furnish the supplementary information, the tax commissioner, after thirty days’ notice, may determine the North Dakota tax liability from the best information available and assess any tax due, including interest and penalty. The taxpayer may protest the determination under the protest procedure provided for the type of tax assessed.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 648, § 2.

57-01-18.
Disclosure of name and address by state tax commissioner.

Notwithstanding the secrecy and confidential information provisions of this title, for the purpose of properly administering the tax laws of this state, name and address information filed on returns by or on behalf of a person with the tax commissioner pursuant to a tax law of this state, obtained by the tax commissioner pursuant to that tax law, or furnished to the tax commissioner under section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 6103] may be provided by the tax commissioner to the United States postal service or a national change-of-address vendor authorized by the United States postal service, for the sole purpose of obtaining proper and correct address information on that person.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 506, § 1.

57-01-19.
Claim of unconstitutionality — Refund or credit of taxes paid.

Notwithstanding any provision relating to claims for refund or credit of state taxes paid contained in title 57, any claim for a refund or credit of taxes paid based upon a claim that the tax or any provision thereof is unconstitutional under the federal or state constitution must be made within one hundred eighty days of the due date of the return or payment of the tax, whichever occurs first, for which the refund or credit is claimed. A claim for refund or credit of taxes paid before January 1, 2005, based upon a claim that the tax or any provision thereof is unconstitutional that is not filed with the commissioner before July 1, 2005, must be denied. This section does not apply to ad valorem property taxes.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 543, § 1.

57-01-20.
Multistate tax audit fund — Continuing appropriation — Transfers to the general fund.

There is created in the state treasury the multistate tax audit fund. The fund consists of all moneys collected and received by the tax commissioner as a result of participation in the multistate tax commission audit and nexus programs. All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the tax commissioner on a continuing basis to pay the multistate tax commission audit and nexus program fees. On or before June thirtieth of each year, the tax commissioner shall certify to the state treasurer the amount of accumulated funds in the multistate tax audit fund which exceed the audit and nexus program fees for the following year. The state treasurer shall transfer the certified amount from the multistate tax audit fund to the general fund prior to the end of each fiscal year.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 5, § 8, effective July 1, 2017.